North Carolina, session 2025, HB484.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The African American Heritage Commission (hereinafter
"Commission") is authorized to study the feasibility of establishing monuments commemorating
events relating to the civil rights movement in North Carolina and the State's citizens that
contributed to the civil rights movement. In conducting its study, the Commission shall hold
public hearings/meetings to get citizen input. By May 1, 2026, the Commission shall report its
findings and any recommendations for legislation to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee
on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Natural and Cultural Resources, African American Heritage Commission, the sum of five
hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to aid
the Commission in its current work of placing markers, signage, and other memorials to
commemorate significant cultural or historical importance relating to North Carolina's Civil
Rights Trail.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H484-v-1*